Arkansas, session 2025, HB1374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 4, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-4-221. Report concerning contracts awarded to businesses in
operation less than five years.
(a) By January 1 of each year, the Director of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission shall file an annual report that includes without
limitation:
(1) The number and total dollar amount of state contracts
awarded to businesses that have been in operation for less than five (5)
years, including a breakdown by demographic segments and geographic areas
throughout the state;
(2) The percentage of the total number of state contracts
awarded to businesses that have been in operation for less than five (5)
*MBM109*
01/31/2025 3:00:06 PM MBM109

HB1374
years compared to the total number of state contracts awarded;
(3) The percentage of the total dollar amount of state contracts
awarded to businesses that have been in operation for less than five (5)
years compared to the total dollar amount of state contracts awarded; and
(4) Recommendations on improving access to state contracts for
Arkansas businesses that have been in operation for less than five (5) years,
including without limitation businesses in statistically underrepresented
demographic segments and geographic areas of Arkansas.
(b) The annual report under subsection (a) of this section shall be
filed with the:
(1) Governor;
(2) House Committee on Insurance and Commerce; and
(3) Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. The first annual
report under § 15-4-221 is due by January 1, 2027.




















01/31/2025 3:00:06 PM MBM109